Hawaii statutes.
§227D-5 Special fund. There is
established in the state treasury a fund to be known as the natural energy
laboratory of Hawaii authority special fund, into which shall be deposited all
moneys and fees from tenants or other users of the authority's parks, projects,
other leased facilities, and other services and publications as well as any
grants or gifts received by the authority. All moneys in the fund are
appropriated for the purposes of and shall be expended by the authority for the
operation, maintenance, and management of its parks, projects, facilities,
services, and publications, and for the design and construction of new
facilities and the renovation of or addition to existing facilities. [L 1990, c
224, pt of §3; am L 1993, c 252, §4 and c 280, §19; am L 1994, c 179, §§2 to 4]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next